District of Columbia statutes.
32-507

Prohibited acts.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any person to interfere with, restrain, or deny the exercise of or the attempt to exercise any right provided by this chapter.

(b)

It shall be unlawful for an employer to discharge or discriminate in any manner against any person because the person:

(1)

Opposes any practice made unlawful by this chapter;

(2)

Pursuant or related to this chapter:

(A)

Files or attempts to file a charge;

(B)

Institutes or attempts to institute a proceeding; or

(C)

Facilitates the institution of a proceeding; or

(3)

Gives any information or testimony in connection with an inquiry or proceeding related to this chapter.

Oct. 3, 1990, D.C. Law 8-181, § 8, 37 DCR 5043
1981 Ed., § 36-1307.